Hawaii statutes.
§386-162 Terms defined. "Personal
injury", "compensation", and "dependents" within the
meaning of section 386-161 has the same meaning as is given to these terms in
sections 386-1 and 386-42. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-151; HRS
§386-162]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next